Illinois, session 104th, HB661.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Volunteer Board Member Removal Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 60/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Local 8Volunteer Board Member Removal Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-602, eff. 8-27-21.)